Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 2
HABITUAL OFFENDERS

42-2-201. Legislative declaration concerning habitual offenders of motor vehicle laws.

It is declared to be the policy of this state:

To provide maximum safety for all persons who travel or otherwise use the public highways of this state;

To deny the privilege of operating motor vehicles on such highways to persons who by their conduct and record have demonstrated their indifference to the safety and welfare of others and their disrespect for the laws of this state, the orders of its courts, and the statutorily required acts of its administrative agencies; and

To discourage repetition of criminal acts by individuals against the peace and dignity of this state and its political subdivisions and to impose increased and added deprivation of the privilege to operate motor vehicles upon habitual offenders who have been convicted repeatedly of violations of the traffic laws.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2158, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

42-2-202. Habitual offenders - frequency and type of violations.

An habitual offender is any person, resident or nonresident, who has accumulated convictions for separate and distinct offenses described in subsection (2) of this section committed during a seven-year period or committed during a five-year period for separate and distinct offenses described in subsection (3) of this section; except that, where more than one included offense is committed within a one-day period, such multiple offenses shall be treated for the purposes of this part 2 as one offense. The record as maintained in the office of the department shall be considered prima facie evidence of the said convictions.

An habitual offender is a person having three or more convictions of any of the following separate and distinct offenses arising out of separate acts committed within a period of seven years:

DUI, DUI per se, or DWAI;

Driving a motor vehicle in a reckless manner, in violation of section 42-4-1401;

Driving a motor vehicle upon a highway while such person's license or privilege to drive a motor vehicle has been denied, suspended, or revoked, in violation of section 42-2-138 (1);

Knowingly making any false affidavit or swearing or affirming falsely to any matter or thing required by the motor vehicle laws or as to information required in the administration of such laws;

Vehicular assault or vehicular homicide, or manslaughter or criminally negligent homicide which results from the operation of a motor vehicle, or aggravated motor vehicle theft, as such offenses are described in title 18, C.R.S.;

Conviction of the driver of a motor vehicle involved in any accident involving death or personal injuries for failure to perform the duties required of such person under section 42-4-1601.

The offenses included in subparagraphs (I), (II), (III), and (V) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) shall be deemed to include convictions under any federal law, any law of another state, or any ordinance of a municipality that substantially conforms to the statutory provisions of this state regulating the operation of motor vehicles. For purposes of this paragraph (b), the term "municipality" means any home rule or statutory city or town, a territorial charter city, or a city and county.

A person is also an habitual offender if such person has ten or more convictions of separate and distinct offenses arising out of separate acts committed within a period of five years involving moving violations which provide for an assessment of four or more points each or eighteen or more convictions of separate and distinct offenses arising out of separate acts committed within a period of five years involving moving violations which provide for an assessment of three or less points each in the operation of a motor vehicle, which convictions are required to be reported to the department and result in the assessment of points under section 42-2-127, including any violations specified in subsection (2) of this section.

For the purpose of this section, the term "conviction" has the meaning specified in section 42-2-127 (6) and includes entry of judgment for commission of a traffic infraction as set forth in section 42-4-1701.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2158, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 97:

(2)(a)(I) amended, p. 1466, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(2)(a)(I) amended, p. 251, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(2)(a)(I) amended, (HB 13-1325), ch. 331, p. 1883, § 12, effective May 28.

L. 2017:

(2)(a)(III) amended, (HB 17-1162), ch. 208, p. 811, § 3, effective August 9.

Cross references:

For collateral attacks of traffic convictions, see §§ 42-4-1702 and 42-4-1708.

42-2-203. Authority to revoke license of habitual offender.

The department shall immediately revoke the license of any person whose record brings such person within the definition of an habitual offender in section 42-2-202. The procedure specified in section 42-2-125 (3) and (4) shall be employed for the revocation.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2159, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (HB 09-1234), ch. 91, p. 353, § 2, effective August 5.

42-2-204. Appeals.

An appeal may be taken from any action entered under the provisions of this part 2 as provided in section 42-2-135.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2160, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

42-2-205. Prohibition.

No license to operate motor vehicles in this state shall be issued to an habitual offender, nor shall an habitual offender operate a motor vehicle in this state:

For a period of five years from the date of the order of the department finding such person to be an habitual offender except as may be permitted by section 42-2-132.5; and

Until such time as financial responsibility requirements are met.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2160, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1082, § 11, effective January 1, 2001.

42-2-206. Driving after revocation prohibited.

It is unlawful for any person to operate any motor vehicle in this state while the revocation of the department prohibiting the operation remains in effect. Any person found to be an habitual offender, who operates a motor vehicle in this state while the revocation of the department prohibiting such operation is in effect, commits a class 1 misdemeanor.
(1) (a) (I) It is unlawful for any person to operate any motor vehicle in this state while the revocation of the department prohibiting the operation remains in effect. Any person found to be an habitual offender, who operates a motor vehicle in this state while the revocation of the department prohibiting such operation is in effect, commits a class 1 misdemeanor.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 18-1.3-501, C.R.S., any person convicted of violating subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a) shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of imprisonment in the county jail for thirty days, or a mandatory minimum fine of three thousand dollars, or both. The minimum jail sentence and fine required by this subparagraph (II) shall be in addition to any other penalty provided in section 18-1.3-501, C.R.S. The court may suspend all or a portion of the mandatory jail sentence or fine if the defendant successfully completes no less than forty hours, and no greater than three hundred hours, of useful public service. In no event shall the court sentence the convicted person to probation. Upon the defendant's successful completion of the useful public service, the court shall vacate the suspended sentence. In the event the defendant fails or refuses to complete the useful public service ordered, the court shall impose the jail sentence, fine, or both, as required under this subparagraph (II).

A person commits the crime of aggravated driving with a revoked license if he or she is found to be an habitual offender and thereafter operates a motor vehicle in this state while the revocation of the department prohibiting such operation is in effect and, as a part of the same criminal episode, also commits any of the following offenses:

Repealed.

Reckless driving, as described in section 42-4-1401;

Eluding or attempting to elude a police officer, as described in section 42-4-1413;

Violation of any of the requirements specified for accidents and accident reports in sections 42-4-1601 to 42-4-1606; or

Vehicular eluding, as described in section 18-9-116.5, C.R.S.

Aggravated driving with a revoked license is a class 1 misdemeanor, punishable as provided in section 18-1.3-501, C.R.S.; except that a court shall sentence the offender to a mandatory minimum term of imprisonment of sixty days in the custody of a county jail.

If a defendant is convicted of aggravated driving with a revoked license based upon the commission of DUI, DUI per se, or DWAI pursuant to sub-subparagraph (A) or (B) of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b), as that crime existed before August 5, 2015:

The court shall convict and sentence the offender for each offense separately;

The court shall impose all of the penalties for the alcohol-related driving offense, as such penalties are described in section 42-4-1307;

The provisions of section 18-1-408, C.R.S., shall not apply to the sentences imposed for either conviction;

Any probation imposed for a conviction under this section may run concurrently with any probation required by section 42-4-1307; and

The department shall reflect both convictions on the defendant's driving record.

For the purpose of enforcing this section in any case in which the accused is charged with driving a motor vehicle while such person's license, permit, or privilege to drive is revoked or is charged with driving without a license, the court, before hearing such charges, shall require the district attorney to determine whether such person has been determined to be an habitual offender and by reason of such determination is barred from operating a motor vehicle on the highways of this state. If the district attorney determines that the accused has been so held, the district attorney shall cause the appropriate criminal charges to be lodged against the accused.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2160, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 99:

(1) amended, p. 796, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(1)(a) amended, p. 682, § 1, effective July 1; (1)(a) and IP(1)(b)(I) amended and (1)(b)(I)(F) added, p. 710, § 46, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(1)(a)(II) and (1)(b)(II) amended, p. 1560, § 364, effective October 1.

L. 2008:

(1)(b)(I)(A) and (1)(b)(I)(B) amended, p. 251, § 16, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(1)(b)(III) added, (HB 10-1347), ch. 258, p. 1158, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

(1)(b)(I)(A) and (1)(b)(I)(B) repealed and (1)(b)(II) and IP(1)(b)(III) amended, (HB 15-1043), ch. 262, p. 996, § 4, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (1)(a) by House Bill 00-1107 and House Bill 00-1426 were harmonized.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsections (1)(a)(II) and (1)(b)(II), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

42-2-207. No existing law modified.

Nothing in this part 2 shall be construed as amending, modifying, or repealing any existing law of this state or any existing ordinance of any political subdivision relating to the operation of motor vehicles or the providing of penalties for the violation thereof; nor shall anything in this part 2 be construed as precluding the exercise of the regulatory powers of any division, agency, department, or political subdivision of this state having the statutory authority to regulate such operation or licensing.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2160, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

42-2-208. Computation of number of convictions.

With respect to persons charged as habitual offenders, in computing the number of convictions, all convictions must result from offenses occurring on or after July 1, 1973.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2160, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.